Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 6. Contested Cases
§ 27-14-616.
Medical commission; hearing panels; creation; membership; duties; rulemaking.

The medical commission is created to consist of eleven (11) health care providers appointed by the governor as follows:

Seven (7) licensed physicians appointed from a list of not less than fourteen (14) nominees submitted by the Wyoming Medical Society;

Four (4) health care providers appointed from a list of not less than eight (8) nominees developed and submitted by appropriate health care provider groups selected by the director.

One (1) member shall be elected by commission members as chairman and one (1) as vice-chairman. The division shall designate an employee to serve as executive secretary of the commission or contract with an individual to provide executive secretary services to the commission. The governor may appoint no more than eleven (11) additional health care providers as associate members of the commission whose function is limited to serving as members of individual medical hearing panels. Except for initial members, the terms of commission members and associate members shall be three (3) years. Three (3) members of the initial commission and three (3) initial associate members shall be appointed to a one (1) year term and four (4) initial commission members and four (4) initial associate members shall be appointed to a two (2) year term. The duties of the commission shall be:

To promulgate rules and regulations, with the approval of the director of the department, declaring particular medical, hospital or other health care procedures either acceptable or not necessary in the treatment of injuries or particular classes of injuries and therefore either compensable or not compensable under this act or expanding or limiting the compensability of such procedures under this act;

To promulgate rules and regulations, with the approval of the director of the department, establishing criteria for certification of temporary total disability by health care providers and setting forth the types of injuries for which particular health care providers may certify temporary total disability pursuant to W.S. 27-14-404(g);

To advise the division, upon request, on the usefulness of medical cost containment measures;

To furnish three (3) members of the commission to serve as a medical hearing panel to hear cases referred for hearing. The division shall refer medically contested cases to the commission for hearing by a medical hearing panel. The decision to refer a contested case to the office of administrative hearings or a medical hearing panel established under this section shall not be subject to further administrative review. Following referral by the division, the hearing examiner or medical hearing panel shall have jurisdiction to hear and decide all issues related to the written notice of objection filed pursuant to W.S. 27-14-601(k). Different medical hearing panels with different membership may be selected to hear different cases, but a panel may hear more than one (1) case. Individual medical hearing panels shall be selected by the executive secretary under the supervision and guidance of the chairman of the medical commission. At least one (1) member of each panel shall be a physician. One (1) member shall be designated by the executive secretary to serve as chairman of the panel. When hearing a medically contested case, the panel shall serve as the hearing examiner and shall have exclusive jurisdiction to make the final administrative determination of the validity and amount of compensation payable under this act. For cases referred to the medical commission as small claims hearings under W.S. 27-14-602(b), the medical hearing panel may consist of one (1) physician who shall serve as the hearing examiner and shall have exclusive jurisdiction to make the final administrative determination of the validity and amount of compensation payable under this act; and

To advise the division regarding any suspected substandard or inappropriate medical or health care provided to an injured worker by a health care provider or health care facility;

To establish by rule and regulation procedures for decisions pursuant to W.S. 27-15-102(h) and for rebuttals pursuant to W.S.

27-15-103

and to adopt other rules as necessary to implement W.S.

27-15-101

through

27-15-103

.

The members of the commission and of medical hearing panels and any health care provider providing peer reviews or independent medical evaluations, reviews or opinions, when serving shall be deemed public employees for purposes of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, and shall be immune from liability pursuant to W.S.

1-39-104

.

The division shall establish a fee schedule for the compensation of members of the medical commission and medical hearing panels for their professional services to be paid from the worker’s compensation account.

Upon agreement of all parties to a case, the hearing examiner in a contested case under this chapter may transfer a medically contested case to a medical hearing panel or may seek the advice of the medical commission on specified medical issues in the contested case. The advice shall be in writing and shall become part of the record of the case.

Any member of the commission who knows or has reasonable cause to believe or suspect that a health care provider or health care facility has provided substandard or inappropriate medical or health care shall immediately report it to the appropriate professional or facility licensing authority and to the division.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 229, § 1; 1995, ch. 157, § 1; 1996, ch. 82, § 1; 1997, ch. 177, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2012, ch. 48, § 1; 2017 ch. 139, § 2, effective March 3, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “account” for “fund” at the end of (d).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (b)(v) and made related changes; in (c), inserted “and any health care provider providing
peer reviews or independent medical evaluations, reviews or opinions” and “be deemed public employees for purposes of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, and shall,” and substituted “pursuant to W.S.

1-39-104

” for “and shall be defended by the attorney general if sued and indemnified against loss from legal action in the same manner as state employees”; and added (f).

The 2017 amendment

added (b)(vi).

Laws 2017, ch. 139, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1996, ch. 82, § 3 provides that in response to the Wyoming Supreme Court's order of February 21, 1995, in the matter of Steven B. Starr v. Sunlight Ranches, et al., it was the intent of the legislature and the legislature declares, that the medical commission established under § 27-14-616(a) have subject matter jurisdiction over medically contested cases commencing on or after January 1, 1994, regardless of the date of injury.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Jurisdiction. —

Wyoming Office of the Medical Commission's decision, that claimant failed in meeting his burden of proof in establishing that his medical treatment after Sept 21, 2001 was directly and causally related to his employment, had no impact on any of his prior claims. The commission decided only those issues referred to it and did not exceed its jurisdiction in considering and deciding claims. Spletzer v. Wyo. ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 90, 116 P.3d 1103,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2005).

In a workers’ compensation case, because an air ambulance company’s interest claim was not addressed in the summary judgment order and therefore was not included in the matter over which the district court acquired jurisdiction, the company’s claim presented an issue separate from but related to the company’s objections referred for hearing, and the Office of Administrative Hearings retained jurisdiction to rule on the interest motion. Air Methods v. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2018 WY 128, 432 P.3d 476,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2018).

Determination by worker's compensation division whether torefer case. —

The worker's compensation division must determine if a case is medically contested, and if it is, it must be referred to the medical commission. Russell v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 944 P.2d 1151,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1997).

Worker's compensation division, pursuant to its rule defining “medically contested cases,” properly determined that petitioner's claim did not warrant medical commission review. Bando v. Clure Bros. Furniture, 980 P.2d 323,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1999).

Appellate review. —

Where a hearing is before the medical commission, the standard of appellate review is no different than it would be where the hearing is conducted before a hearing officer. Bucklin v. State ex rel. Wy. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Bucklin), 2001 WY 101, 33 P.3d 440,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2001).

A worker's compensation case involving a disputed impairment rating

which was initially referred to the Office of Administrative Hearings was transferred to the medical commission pursuant to W.S. § 27-14-405(m). Lyles v. State ex rel. Division of Workers' Compensation (In re Lyles), 957 P.2d 843,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1998).

Retroactive application. —

Where subsequent expository legislation clearly announced intent that medical commission hear all medically contested workers' compensation cases regardless of date of injury, this legislation controlled over prior case law and over prior, general legislation; medical commission therefore had jurisdiction to hear medically contested case involving injury which occurred before commission was established. Pohl v. Bailey Co., 980 P.2d 816,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1999).

Medically contested case. —

Medical Commission had jurisdiction under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-616(b)(iv) to hear only medically contested cases; having concluded that this was not such a case, the Medical Commission did not then have the statutory authority to proceed to consider the legal issues involved. In re Worker's Compensation Claim v. State Ex Rel. Wyoming Med. Comm'n & Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 2005 WY 104, 118 P.3d 441,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(2005).

Although the Medical Commission properly recognized that the case before it involved a legal issue rather than a medical issue, it erred when it failed to dismiss the case for lack of subject matter jurisdiction, but instead, directly referred the case to the Office of Administrative Hearings.
Birkle v. State Ex Rel. Wyoming Workers'
Safety & Compensation Div., 2007 WY 9, 150 P.3d 187,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Jan. 18, 2007).

A “medically contested case” is one in which the primary issue requires the application of a medical judgment to complex medical facts or conflicting diagnoses; thus, where the ultimate issue in a case was an issue of law, it was outside the jurisdiction of the Medical Commission. French v. Amax Coal West, 960 P.2d 1023,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1998).

Referral to the Wyoming Medical Commission is proper when cases primarily involve medically contested issues, including, but not limited to, those identified in Rules, Regulations and Fee Schedules of the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division, Chapter 6, § 1 (a)(i)(A)-(D); the fact that the Medical Commission may, in the course of deciding that medical issue, also be asked to consider non-medical issues does not deprive it of authority to decide the case. Therefore, where the primary issue for determination was the medically contested issue of whether a benefits claimant's back problems were caused by a work-related injury, the Medical Commission had authority to decide the case.
McIntosh v. State ex rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n, 2007 WY 108, 162 P.3d 483,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2007).

Where a workers’ compensation claimant’s request for an endless pool was denied, the case was properly referred the case to the Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH), rather than to the Workers’ Compensation Medical Commission because the case was not medically contested since the reasonableness and necessity of the endless pool as treatment was not disposition to either of the claimant’s contested cases, but rather, the legal issues were the principal issues. McCallister v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2022 WY 66, 510 P.3d 1051,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2022).

Failure to seek transfer to commission. —

The medical commission has provided for referrals from hearing examiners to the medical panel upon agreement of all of the parties, and it is necessary for a claimant to seek such a transfer to avoid waiver of the issue of whether his claim should have been referred to the commission. Russell v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 944 P.2d 1151,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1997).

Failure to make basic findings of fact. —

Medical Commission Hearing Panel's order denying the claimant workers' compensation benefits for gastrointestinal problems violated the Wyoming Administrative Procedures Act by failing to make basic findings of fact that supported its ultimate findings; the decision cited no evidence or medical opinions and made no basic findings to support its conclusion that the claimant's condition changed substantially after August 2002 or to explain the conclusion that had the narcotic pain medications been responsible for the esophageal stricture, it would have appeared earlier. In re Worker's Compensation Claim v. State Ex Rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 2006 WY 65, 135 P.3d 568,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2006).

Determination of issue by commission not required. —

Where neither conflicting medical opinion nor the nature of the injury was central to the issue of whether claimant's injury was work-related, it was appropriate that a hearing examiner resolve the issue of whether or not the injury was work-related. Russell v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 944 P.2d 1151,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1997).

Pre-existing disease. —

District court erred in affirming the medical commission's determination that employee failed to show, by a preponderance of the evidence, that treatment and surgery of her neck and shoulder injury were not related to a preexisting cancer and were related to her work injury where the expert medical testimony adduced before the commission established, without a doubt, that there was a preexisting cancer. However, according to that same expert medical testimony, its only role under the circumstances of this case was to predispose employee to the sort of injury that she suffered while at work. Bucklin v. State ex rel. Wy. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Bucklin), 2001 WY 101, 33 P.3d 440,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2001).

Quoted

in

Serda v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 38, 42 P.3d 466,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2002); Stevens v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2014 WY 153,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Dec. 2, 2014).

Cited

in

Jackson v. J.W. Williams, Inc., 886 P.2d 601,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1994); State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. v. Wright, 983 P.2d 1227,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1999); Decker v. State ex rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n, 2005 WY 160, 124 P.3d 686,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(2005); Nagle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Nagle), 2008 WY 99, 190 P.3d 159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Aug. 19, 2008).

Stated in

Porter v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2017 WY 69, 396 P.3d 999,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2017).